Massachusetts, session 194th, S2128.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the
General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the commissioner of capital
asset management and maintenance, in consultation with the department of the state police, may
convey to Mary Faugno-Wiles a certain parcel of land in the town of Brookfield. The parcel
consists of 35,000 square feet, more or less, and is shown on a plan of land entitled “Plan of
Land at 14 Mill Street”, dated March 23, 2021, prepared by Summit Engineering & Land
Survey, Inc. and described in a deed recorded in the Worcester district registry of deeds in book
2514, page 139. Such plan of land shall be placed on file with the division of capital asset
management and maintenance. The conveyance shall be subject to such additional conditions
of 3

and restrictions as the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance, in
consultation with the department of state police, may prescribe.
(b) As consideration for the conveyance of the parcel of land described in subsection (a),
Mary Faugno-Wiles shall convey to the commissioner of capital asset management and
maintenance a certain parcel of land on South Maple street in the town of Brookfield consisting
of 38,000 square feet, more or less, and shown on the plan of land described in subsection (a)
and described in a deed recorded in the Worcester district registry of deeds in book 21493, page
111 or such other land or interest in land as the commissioner of capital asset management and
maintenance, in consultation with the department of the state police, may deem appropriate.
(c) As further consideration for the conveyance in subsection (a), Mary Faugno-Wiles
shall pay the difference between the full and fair market value of the parcel described in
subsection (a) and the full and fair market value of the parcel described in subsection (b). The
commonwealth shall not be obligated to pay any consideration to Mary Faugno-Wiles if the full
and fair market value of the parcel of land described in subsection (b) exceeds the full and fair
market value of the parcel described in subsection (a). The full and fair market value of the
parcels shall be determined by the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance
on the basis of independent appraisals commissioned by the commissioner.
(d) The commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance shall submit the
appraisal or appraisals to the inspector general for review and approval, which shall include an
examination of the methodology utilized for the appraisal or appraisals. The inspector general
shall file the report with the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance who
shall submit copies of the appraisals and the inspector general’s review and approval to the house
of 3

and senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee on state administration and
regulatory oversight not less than 15 days prior to the execution of documents effecting the
transfers described in section 1.
(e) Any consideration paid by Mary Faugno-Wiles to the commonwealth for the
conveyance authorized by this act shall be deposited into the General Fund.
SECTION 2. Mary Faugno-Wiles, or any successors or assigns, shall be responsible for
all costs that the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance may deem
necessary to complete the conveyances authorized by section 1 including, but not limited to, the
costs of all appraisals, surveys, deeds and other document preparation, recording or filing fees
and any other expenses.
of 3